Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1319.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 201(7) of the act of August 24, 1963 (P.L.1175, No.497), known as the Mechanics' Lien Law of 1963, is amended to read:Section 201. Definitions.--The following words, terms and phrases when used in this act shall have the meaning ascribed to them in this section, except where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:* * *(7) "Materials" means building materials and supplies of all kinds, and also includes fixtures, machinery and equipment, including rented equipment reasonably necessary [to and] for the construction of or incorporated into the improvement.* * *12345678910111213141516171819 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB1319PN1490 - 2 - 1